el: Ποικιλία τζιν: Τζιν με γεύση; Τζιν Genever; Τζιν London dry; Τζιν Old Tom; Τζιν Plymouth; Άλλο
es: Variedad de ginebra: Ginebra aromatizada; Ginebra Genever; Ginebra London dry; Ginebra Old Tom; Ginebra Plymouth; Otros
cs: Druh ginu: Ochucený gin; Gin Genever; Gin London Dry; Gin Old Tom; Gin Plymouth; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta gina: Aromatiziran gin; Genever gin; Londonski suhi gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Drugo
ja: ジンの種類: フレーバージン; ジュネヴァジン; ロンドンドライジン; オールドトムジン; プリマスジン; その他
zh-TW: 琴酒種類: 風味琴酒; 杜松子酒; 倫敦琴酒; 老湯姆琴酒; 普利茅斯琴酒; 其他
th: ลักษณะเหล้าจิน: จินแต่งกลิ่น; เจนีเวอร์ จิน; ลอนดอน ดราย จิน; โอลด์ ทอม จิน; พรีเมาธ์ จิน; อื่นๆ
nb: Gin-variant: Smaksatt gin; Genever gin; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Annet
it: Varietà di gin: Gin aromatizzato; Gin Genever; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Altro
fr: Variété de gin: Gin aromatisé; Gin de genièvre; Gin London Dry; Gin Old Tom; Gin Plymouth; Autre
fi: Ginivalikoima: Maustettu gin; Genever-gin; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Muu
da: Ginvariant: Gin med smag; Genever gin; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Andet
de: Auswahl an Gin: Aromatisierter Gin; Genever-Gin; London Dry Gin; Old Tom Gin; Plymouth Gin; Sonstiges
ru: Тип джина: Ароматизированный джин; Джин Genever; Лондонский сухой джин; Джин Старый Том; Джин Plymouth; Другое
ro-RO: Sortiment de gin: Gin aromat; Genever gin; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Altele
lt-LT: Džino rūšis: Aromatizuotas džinas; Jeneveras; Londono sausasis džinas; „Old Tom“ džinas; Plimuto džinas; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta džina: Aromatizirani džin; Genever; Londonski suhi džin; Old Tom; Plymouth; Ostalo
nl: Ginvariant: Gearomatiseerde gin; Jenever; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Andere
vi: Loại rượu Gin: Rượu gin có hương vị; Rượu gin nguyên bản; Rượu gin khô London; Rượu Old Tom; Rượu gin Plymouth; Khác
sv: Ginsort: Smaksatt gin; Genevergin; London Dry-gin; Old Tom-gin; Plymouth-gin; Övrigt
ko: 진 종류: 가향 진; 쥬니버 진; 런던 드라이 진; 올드 톰 진; 플리머스 진; 기타
hu: Gin fajtája: Ízesített gin; Genever gin; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Egyéb
pl: Odmiana ginu: Gin smakowy; Gin Genever; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Inne
zh-CN: 杜松子酒品种: 加味金酒; 荷兰金酒; 伦敦干金酒; 老汤姆金酒; 普利茅斯金酒; 其他
pt-PT: Variedade de gin: Gin aromatizado; Gin Genebra; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Outro
en: Gin variety: Flavored gin; Genever gin; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Other
sk-SK: Druh ginu: Ochutený gin; Genever gin; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth gin; Iné
tr: Cin Çeşitleri: Aromalı cin; Genever cin; London dry gin; Old Tom gin; Plymouth cin; Diğer
pt-BR: Variedade de gim: Gim aromatizado; Gim Genebra; Gin seco londrino; Old Tom Gin; Plymouth Gin; Outro
bg-BG: Разновидност на джина: Овкусен джин; Джин Genever; Лондонски сух джин; Джин Old Tom; Джин Плимут; Други